src/adj-nno-lex.txt
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
irregadj ;
regadj ;

LEXICON irregadj
GOD ;
STOR ;
full GOD ;
jam GOD ;
jevn GOD ;



LEXICON GOD
god+A+Sg+Indef+Masc:god # ;
god+A+Sg+Indef+Fem:god # ;
god+A+Sg+Indef+Neu:godt # ;
god+A+Sg+Def:gode # ;
god+A+Pl+Indef:gode # ;
god+A+Pl+Def:gode # ;
god+A+Comp:betre # ;
god+A+Superl:best # ;

LEXICON STOR
stor+A+Sg+Msc+Indef:stor # ;
stor+A+Sg+Fem+Indef:stor # ;
stor+A+Sg+Neu+Indef:stort # ;
stor+A+Sg+Def:store # ;
stor+A+Pl+Indef:store # ;
stor+A+Pl+Def:store # ;
stor+A+Sg+Indef:større # ;
stor+A+Sg+Indef:størst # ;
